src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Verb inflection
The Hiligaynon language verbs inflect in persons.

*Verbs examples:*
* *naghambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv`
* *nagahambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Cont`
* *maghambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl`
* *magahambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont`
* *ginhambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Pfv`
* *ginahambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Cont`
* *hambalon:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Ctpl`
* *pagahambalon:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Ctpl+Cont`
* *ginhambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Pfv`
* *ginahambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Cont`
* *ihambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Ctpl`
* *igahambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Ctpl+Cont`
* *ginhambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Pfv`
* *ginahambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Cont`
* *hambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Ctpl`
* *pagahambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Ctpl+Cont`

*Verbs examples:*
* ★*maghambalon:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+ObjV+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*magihambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+InsV+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*maghambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+RecV+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*ihambalon:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+InsV+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*hambalonan:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+RecV+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*ihambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+InsV+RecV+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*naganaghambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv+Cont` (is not standard language)
* ★*nagmaghambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*ginginahambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Pfv+Cont` (is not standard language)
* ★*ginhambalon:* `hambal+V+Ind+ObjV+Pfv+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*ginihambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Pfv+Cont` (is not standard language)
* ★*ginihambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+InsV+Pfv+Ctpl` (is not standard language)
* ★*ginginahambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Pfv+Cont` (is not standard language)
* ★*ginhambalan:* `hambal+V+Ind+RecV+Pfv+Ctpl` (is not standard language)

*Reduplication examples:*
* *naghambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv+Iter`
* *naghambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv+Aug`
* *naghambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Pfv+Dim`
* *nagahambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Cont+Iter`
* *nagahambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Cont+Aug`
* *nagahambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Cont+Dim`
* *maghambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Iter`
* *maghambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Aug`
* *maghambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Dim`
* *magahambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Iter`
* *magahambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Aug`
* *magahambal-hambal:* `hambal+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Dim`
* *magadala-dalagan:* `dalagan+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Dim`

*Reduplication examples:*
* ★*magadalagan-dalagan:* `dalagan+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Dim` (is not standard language)
* ★*magadalag-dalagan:* `dalagan+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Dim` (is not standard language)
* ★*magadalagan-dala:* `dalagan+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Dim` (is not standard language)
* ★*magadal-dalagan:* `dalagan+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Dim` (is not standard language)
* ★*magadaladalagan:* `dalagan+V+Ind+ActV+Ctpl+Cont+Dim` (is not standard language)

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-hil/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
